apertium-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="/she__prn">
      <e><p><l>she</l><r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>her</l><r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hers</l><r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>herself</l><r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="this__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- proper noun pardefs -->
    <pardef n="name__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- verb pardefs -->
    <pardef n="walk__v">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arriv/e__v">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/o__v">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oes</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>id</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oing</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on't</l><r>o<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><j/>not<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="love__v">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/eat__v">
      <e><p><l>eat</l><r>eat<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eats</l><r>eat<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>eat<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eaten</l><r>eat<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eating</l><r>eat<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/un__v">
      <e><p><l>un</l><r>un<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uns</l><r>un<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>un<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unning</l><r>un<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kn/ow__v">
      <e><p><l>ow</l><r>ow<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ows</l><r>ow<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>ow<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>own</l><r>ow<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>owing</l><r>ow<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="read__v">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dr/ink__v">
      <e><p><l>ink</l><r>ink<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inks</l><r>ink<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ank</l><r>ink<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r>ink<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inking</l><r>ink<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/it__v">
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>it<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>its</l><r>it<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>it<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itting</l><r>it<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sle/ep__v">
      <e><p><l>ep</l><r>ep<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eps</l><r>ep<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pt</l><r>ep<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eping</l><r>ep<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ve__v">
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>ve<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>ve<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ving</l><r>ve<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ing__v">
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ings</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ang</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ung</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inging</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/be__v">
      <e><p><l>be</l><r>be<s n="v"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>be<s n="v"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>be<s n="v"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>been</l><r>be<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>are</l><r>be<s n="v"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wr/ite__v">
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ite<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ites</l><r>ite<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ote</l><r>ite<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itten</l><r>ite<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iting</l><r>ite<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/go__v">
      <e><p><l>go</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>goes</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>went</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gone</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>going</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="lik/e__v">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r>go<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="underst/and__v">
      <e><p><l>and</l><r>and<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ands</l><r>and<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ood</l><r>and<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anding</l><r>and<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stud/y__v">
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ied</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ying</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dr/aw__v">
      <e><p><l>aw</l><r>aw<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aws</l><r>aw<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>aw<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awing</l><r>aw<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/y__v">
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ying</l><r>y<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sp/eak__v">
      <e><p><l>eak</l><r>eak<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eaks</l><r>eak<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oke</l><r>eak<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eaking</l><r>eak<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ee__v">
      <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ees</l><r>ee<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aw</l><r>ee<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eeing</l><r>ee<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="she"><i></i><par n="/she__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="they"><i>they</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="this"><i>this</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="that"><i>that</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="what"><i>what</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="John"><i>John</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Michael"><i>Michael</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jose"><i>Jose</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Anna"><i>Anna</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Emily"><i>Emily</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="David"><i>David</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jessica"><i>Jessica</i><par n="name__np"/></e>
    <e lm="arrive"><i>arriv</i><par n="arriv/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i></i><par n="/be__v"/></e>
    <e lm="call"><i>call</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="cry"><i>cr</i><par n="stud/y__v"/></e>
    <e lm="dance"><i>danc</i><par n="arriv/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="drink"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__v"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>d</i><par n="d/o__v"/></e>
    <e lm="draw"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__v"/></e>
    <e lm="eat"><i></i><par n="/eat__v"/></e>
    <e lm="explain"><i>explain</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="go"><i></i><par n="/go__v"/></e>
    <e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__v"/></e>
    <e lm="hear"><i>hear</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="invite"><i>invit</i><par n="arriv/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="like"><i>lik</i><par n="lik/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="listen"><i>listen</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="love"><i>love</i><par n="love__v"/></e>
    <e lm="know"><i>kn</i><par n="kn/ow__v"/></e>
    <e lm="run"><i>r</i><par n="r/un__v"/></e>
    <e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__v"/></e>
    <e lm="sit"><i>s</i><par n="s/it__v"/></e>
    <e lm="sing"><i>s</i><par n="s/ing__v"/></e>
    <e lm="sleep"><i>sle</i><par n="sle/ep__v"/></e>
    <e lm="smile"><i>smil</i><par n="arriv/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="speak"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/eak__v"/></e>
    <e lm="study"><i>stud</i><par n="stud/y__v"/></e>
    <e lm="read"><i>read</i><par n="read__v"/></e>
    <e lm="understand"><i>underst</i><par n="underst/and__v"/></e>
    <e lm="walk"><i>walk</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="visit"><i>visit</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
    <e lm="write"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__v"/></e>
      <e lm="sing"><i>sing</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="who"><i>who</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="ask"><i>ask</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="clean"><i>clean</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="buy"><i>buy</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="pay"><i>pay</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="save"><i>save</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="open"><i>open</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="start"><i>start</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="begin"><i>begin</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="continue"><i>continue</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="win"><i>win</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="play"><i>play</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="teach"><i>teach</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="fail"><i>fail</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="think"><i>think</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="touch"><i>touch</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="smell"><i>smell</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="believe"><i>believe</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="forget"><i>forget</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="decide"><i>decide</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="need"><i>need</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="prefer"><i>prefer</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="disagree"><i>disagree</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="refuse"><i>refuse</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="hurt"><i>hurt</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="die"><i>die</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="change"><i>change</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="meet"><i>meet</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
      <e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="these"><i>these</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="those"><i>those</i><par n="this__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="thank"><i>thank</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>
